New York, session 2025-2026, S5234.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 73-a of the public officers law, as amended by section 7 of part 3 QQ of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 Every statewide elected official, state officer or employee, member of 5 the legislature, legislative employee and political party chair and 6 every candidate for statewide elected office or for member of the legis- 7 lature shall file an annual statement of financial disclosure containing 8 the information and in the form set forth in subdivision three of this 9 section. Every member of the legislature and candidate for member of the 10 legislature must file their annual statement of financial disclosure 11 electronically in an electronic, readable, searchable and downloadable 12 format. On or before the fifteenth day of May with respect to the 13 preceding calendar year: (1) every member of the legislature, every 14 candidate for member of the legislature and legislative employee shall 15 file such statement with the legislative ethics commission which shall 16 provide such statement along with any requests for exemptions or 17 deletions to the commission on ethics and lobbying in government for 18 filing and rulings with respect to such requests for exemptions or 19 deletions, on or before the thirtieth day of June; and (2) all other 20 individuals required to file such statement shall file it with the 21 commission on ethics and lobbying in government, except that: 22 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 73-a of the public officers law, as 23 amended by section 18 of part QQ of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, 24 subparagraphs (b), (b-2), and (c) of paragraph 8 as separately amended EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03006-01-5 S. 5234 2 1 by section 8 of part QQ of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022 and paragraph 2 16-a as added by chapter 591 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. (a) The annual statement of financial disclosure shall contain the 5 information and shall be in the form set forth hereinbelow: 6 ANNUAL STATEMENT OF FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE - (For calendar year ________) 7 1. Name ______________________________________________________________ 8 2. (a) Title of Position _____________________________________________ 9 (b) Department, Agency or other Governmental Entity _______________ 10 (c) Address of Present Office _____________________________________ 11 (d) Office Telephone Number _______________________________________ 12 3. (a) Marital Status ______________. If married, please give spouse's 13 full name. 14 __________________________________________________________________. 15 (b) Full name of domestic partner (if applicable). 16 _________________________________________________________________ . 17 (c) List the names of all unemancipated children. 18 ____________________________________________________________________ 19 ____________________________________________________________________ 20 ____________________________________________________________________ 21 ____________________________________________________________________ 22 ____________________________________________________________________ 23 Answer each of the following questions completely, with respect to 24 calendar year _________, unless another period or date is otherwise 25 specified. If additional space is needed, attach additional pages. 26 Whenever a "value" or "amount" is required to be reported herein, such 27 value or amount shall be reported as being within one of the following 28 Categories in Table I or Table II of this subdivision as called for in 29 the question: A reporting individual shall indicate the Category by 30 letter only. 31 Whenever "income" is required to be reported herein, the term "income" 32 shall mean the aggregate net income before taxes from the source identi- 33 fied. 34 The term "calendar year" shall mean the year ending the December 31st 35 preceding the date of filing of the annual statement. 36 4. (a) List any office, trusteeship, directorship, partnership, or 37 position of any nature, whether compensated or not, held by the 38 reporting individual with any firm, corporation, association, part- 39 nership, or other organization other than the State of New York. 40 Include compensated honorary positions; do NOT list membership or 41 uncompensated honorary positions. If the listed entity was licensed 42 by any state or local agency, was regulated by any state regulatory 43 agency or local agency, or, as a regular and significant part of the 44 business or activity of said entity, did business with, or had 45 matters other than ministerial matters before, any state or local 46 agency, list the name of any such agency. 47 State or 48 Position Organization Local Agency S. 5234 3 1 ____________________________________________________________________ 2 ____________________________________________________________________ 3 ____________________________________________________________________ 4 ____________________________________________________________________ 5 ____________________________________________________________________ 6 (b) List any office, trusteeship, directorship, partnership, or position 7 of any nature, whether compensated or not, held by the spouse, 8 domestic partner or unemancipated child of the reporting individual, 9 with any firm, corporation, association, partnership, or other 10 organization other than the State of New York. Include compensated 11 honorary positions; do NOT list membership or uncompensated honorary 12 positions. If the listed entity was licensed by any state or local 13 agency, was regulated by any state regulatory agency or local agen- 14 cy, or, as a regular and significant part of the business or activ- 15 ity of said entity, did business with, or had matters other than 16 ministerial matters before, any state or local agency, list the name 17 of any such agency. 18 State or 19 Position Organization Local Agency 20 ____________________________________________________________________ 21 ____________________________________________________________________ 22 ____________________________________________________________________ 23 ____________________________________________________________________ 24 ____________________________________________________________________ 25 5. (a) List the name, address and description of any occupation, 26 employment (other than the employment listed under Item 2 above), 27 trade, business or profession engaged in by the reporting individ- 28 ual. If such activity was licensed by any state or local agency, was 29 regulated by any state regulatory agency or local agency, or, as a 30 regular and significant part of the business or activity of said 31 entity, did business with, or had matters other than ministerial 32 matters before, any state or local agency, list the name of any such 33 agency. 34 State or 35 Name & Address Local 36 Position of Organization Description Agency 37 ____________________________________________________________________ 38 ____________________________________________________________________ 39 ____________________________________________________________________ 40 ____________________________________________________________________ 41 ____________________________________________________________________ 42 (b) If the spouse, domestic partner or unemancipated child of the 43 reporting individual was engaged in any occupation, employment, 44 trade, business or profession which activity was licensed by any 45 state or local agency, was regulated by any state regulatory agency 46 or local agency, or, as a regular and significant part of the busi- 47 ness or activity of said entity, did business with, or had matters 48 other than ministerial matters before, any state or local agency, S. 5234 4 1 list the name, address and description of such occupation, employ- 2 ment, trade, business or profession and the name of any such agency. 3 State or 4 Name & Address Local 5 Position of Organization Description Agency 6 ____________________________________________________________________ 7 ____________________________________________________________________ 8 ____________________________________________________________________ 9 ____________________________________________________________________ 10 ____________________________________________________________________ 11 6. List any interest, in EXCESS of $1,000, held by the reporting indi- 12 vidual, such individual's spouse, domestic partner or unemancipated 13 child, or partnership of which any such person is a member, or 14 corporation, 10% or more of the stock of which is owned or 15 controlled by any such person, whether vested or contingent, in any 16 contract made or executed by a state or local agency and include the 17 name of the entity which holds such interest and the relationship of 18 the reporting individual or such individual's spouse, domestic part- 19 ner or such child to such entity and the interest in such contract. 20 Do NOT include bonds and notes. Do NOT list any interest in any such 21 contract on which final payment has been made and all obligations 22 under the contract except for guarantees and warranties have been 23 performed, provided, however, that such an interest must be listed 24 if there has been an ongoing dispute during the calendar year for 25 which this statement is filed with respect to any such guarantees or 26 warranties. Do NOT list any interest in a contract made or executed 27 by a local agency after public notice and pursuant to a process for 28 competitive bidding or a process for competitive requests for 29 proposals. 30 Entity Relationship Contracting Category 31 Self, Which Held to Entity State or of 32 Spouse, Interest in and Interest Local Value of 33 Domestic Contract in Contract Agency Contract 34 Partner or 35 Child (In Table II) 36 ____________________________________________________________________ 37 ____________________________________________________________________ 38 ____________________________________________________________________ 39 ____________________________________________________________________ 40 ____________________________________________________________________ 41 7. List any position the reporting individual held as an officer of any 42 political party or political organization, as a member of any poli- 43 tical party committee, or as a political party district leader. The 44 term "party" shall have the same meaning as "party" in the election 45 law. The term "political organization" means any party or independ- 46 ent body as defined in the election law or any organization that is 47 affiliated with or a subsidiary of a party or independent body. S. 5234 5 1 ____________________________________________________________________ 2 ____________________________________________________________________ 3 ____________________________________________________________________ 4 ____________________________________________________________________ 5 ____________________________________________________________________ 6 8. (a) If the reporting individual practices law, is licensed by the 7 department of state as a real estate broker or agent or practices a 8 profession licensed by the department of education, or works as a member 9 or employee of a firm required to register pursuant to section one-e of 10 the legislative law as a lobbyist, describe the services rendered for 11 which compensation was paid including a general description of the prin- 12 cipal subject areas of matters undertaken by such individual and princi- 13 pal duties performed. Specifically state whether the reporting individ- 14 ual provides services directly to clients. Additionally, if such an 15 individual practices with a firm or corporation and is a partner or 16 shareholder of the firm or corporation, give a general description of 17 principal subject areas of matters undertaken by such firm or corpo- 18 ration. 19 ____________________________________________________________________ 20 ____________________________________________________________________ 21 ____________________________________________________________________ 22 ____________________________________________________________________ 23 ____________________________________________________________________ 24 (b) APPLICABLE ONLY TO NEW CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS FOR WHOM SERVICES ARE 25 PROVIDED ON OR AFTER JULY FIRST, TWO THOUSAND TWELVE AND BEFORE DECEMBER 26 THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOUSAND FIFTEEN, OR FOR NEW MATTERS FOR EXISTING 27 CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS WITH RESPECT TO THOSE SERVICES THAT ARE PROVIDED ON 28 OR AFTER JULY FIRST, TWO THOUSAND TWELVE AND BEFORE DECEMBER 29 THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOUSAND FIFTEEN: 30 If the reporting individual personally provides services to any person 31 or entity, or works as a member or employee of a partnership or corpo- 32 ration that provides such services (referred to hereinafter as a 33 "firm"), then identify each client or customer to whom the reporting 34 individual personally provided services, or who was referred to the firm 35 by the reporting individual, and from whom the reporting individual or 36 [his or her] the reporting individual's firm earned fees in excess of 37 $10,000 during the reporting period for such services rendered in direct 38 connection with: 39 (i) A contract in an amount totaling $50,000 or more from the state or 40 any state agency for services, materials, or property; 41 (ii) A grant of $25,000 or more from the state or any state agency 42 during the reporting period; 43 (iii) A grant obtained through a legislative initiative during the 44 reporting period; or 45 (iv) A case, proceeding, application or other matter that is not a 46 ministerial matter before a state agency during the reporting period. 47 For purposes of this question, "referred to the firm" shall mean: 48 having intentionally and knowingly taken a specific act or series of 49 acts to intentionally procure for the reporting individual's firm or 50 knowingly solicit or direct to the reporting individual's firm in whole 51 or substantial part, a person or entity that becomes a client of that 52 firm for the purposes of representation for a matter as defined in S. 5234 6 1 subparagraphs (i) through (iv) of this paragraph, as the result of such 2 procurement, solicitation or direction of the reporting individual. A 3 reporting individual need not disclose activities performed while 4 lawfully acting pursuant to paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and (f) of subdivi- 5 sion seven of section seventy-three of this article. 6 The disclosure requirement in this question shall not require disclo- 7 sure of clients or customers receiving medical or dental services, 8 mental health services, residential real estate brokering services, or 9 insurance brokering services from the reporting individual or [his or 10 her] the reporting individual's firm. The reporting individual need not 11 identify any client to whom [he or she] the reporting individual or [his 12 or her] the reporting individual's firm provided legal representation 13 with respect to investigation or prosecution by law enforcement authori- 14 ties, bankruptcy, or domestic relations matters. With respect to clients 15 represented in other matters, where disclosure of a client's identity is 16 likely to cause harm, the reporting individual shall request an 17 exemption from the commission on ethics and lobbying in government 18 pursuant to section ninety-four of the executive law, provided, however, 19 that a reporting individual who first enters public office after July 20 first, two thousand twelve, need not report clients or customers with 21 respect to matters for which the reporting individual or [his or her] 22 the reporting individual's firm was retained prior to entering public 23 office. 24 Client Nature of Services Provided 25 ________________________________________________________________________ 26 ________________________________________________________________________ 27 ________________________________________________________________________ 28 ________________________________________________________________________ 29 ________________________________________________________________________ 30 (b-1) APPLICABLE ONLY TO NEW CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS FOR WHOM SERVICES 31 ARE PROVIDED ON OR AFTER DECEMBER THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOUSAND FIFTEEN, OR 32 FOR NEW MATTERS FOR EXISTING CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS WITH RESPECT TO THOSE 33 SERVICES THAT ARE PROVIDED ON OR AFTER DECEMBER THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOU- 34 SAND FIFTEEN (FOR PURPOSES OF THIS QUESTION, "SERVICES" SHALL MEAN 35 CONSULTATION, REPRESENTATION, ADVICE OR OTHER SERVICES): 36 If the reporting individual receives income from employment reportable 37 in question 8(a) and personally provides services to any person or enti- 38 ty, or works as a member or employee of a partnership or corporation 39 that provides such services (referred to hereinafter as a "firm"), the 40 reporting individual shall identify each client or customer to whom the 41 reporting individual personally provided services, or who was referred 42 to the firm by the reporting individual, and from whom the reporting 43 individual or [his or her] the reporting individual's firm earned fees 44 in excess of $10,000 during the reporting period in direct connection 45 with: 46 (i) A contract in an amount totaling $10,000 or more from the state or 47 any state agency for services, materials, or property; 48 (ii) A grant of $10,000 or more from the state or any state agency 49 during the reporting period; 50 (iii) A grant obtained through a legislative initiative during the 51 reporting period; or 52 (iv) A case, proceeding, application or other matter that is not a 53 ministerial matter before a state agency during the reporting period. 54 For such services rendered by the reporting individual directly to 55 each such client, describe each matter that was the subject of such S. 5234 7 1 representation, the services actually provided and the payment received. 2 For payments received from clients referred to the firm by the reporting 3 individual, if the reporting individual directly received a referral fee 4 or fees for such referral, identify the client and the payment so 5 received. 6 For purposes of this question, "referred to the firm" shall mean: 7 having intentionally and knowingly taken a specific act or series of 8 acts to intentionally procure for the reporting individual's firm or 9 having knowingly solicited or directed to the reporting individual's 10 firm in whole or substantial part, a person or entity that becomes a 11 client of that firm for the purposes of representation for a matter as 12 defined in clauses (i) through (iv) of this subparagraph, as the result 13 of such procurement, solicitation or direction of the reporting individ- 14 ual. A reporting individual need not disclose activities performed while 15 lawfully acting in [his or her] the reporting individual's capacity as 16 provided in paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and (f) of subdivision seven of 17 section seventy-three of this article. 18 Client Matter Nature of Services Provided Category 19 of Amount 20 (in Table I) 21 ________________________________________________________________________ 22 ________________________________________________________________________ 23 ________________________________________________________________________ 24 ________________________________________________________________________ 25 ________________________________________________________________________ 26 (b-2) APPLICABLE ONLY TO NEW CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS FOR WHOM SERVICES 27 ARE PROVIDED ON OR AFTER DECEMBER THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOUSAND FIFTEEN, OR 28 FOR NEW MATTERS FOR EXISTING CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS WITH RESPECT TO THOSE 29 SERVICES THAT ARE PROVIDED ON OR AFTER DECEMBER THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOU- 30 SAND FIFTEEN (FOR PURPOSES OF THIS QUESTION, "SERVICES" SHALL MEAN 31 CONSULTATION, REPRESENTATION, ADVICE OR OTHER SERVICES): 32 (i) With respect to reporting individuals who receive ten thousand 33 dollars or more from employment or activity reportable under question 34 8(a), for each client or customer NOT otherwise disclosed or exempted in 35 question 8 or 13, disclose the name of each client or customer known to 36 the reporting individual to whom the reporting individual provided 37 services: (A) who paid the reporting individual in excess of five thou- 38 sand dollars for such services; or (B) who had been billed with the 39 knowledge of the reporting individual in excess of five thousand dollars 40 by the firm or other entity named in question 8(a) for the reporting 41 individual's services. 42 Client Services Category of Amount 43 Actually Provided (in Table I) ________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________ 44 FOLLOWING IS AN ILLUSTRATIVE, NON-EXCLUSIVE LIST OF EXAMPLES OF 45 DESCRIPTIONS OF "SERVICES ACTUALLY PROVIDED": 46 * REVIEWED DOCUMENTS AND CORRESPONDENCE; 47 * REPRESENTED CLIENT (IDENTIFY CLIENT BY NAME) IN LEGAL PROCEEDING; 48 * PROVIDED LEGAL ADVICE ON CLIENT MATTER (IDENTIFY CLIENT BY NAME); S. 5234 8 1 * CONSULTED WITH CLIENT OR CONSULTED WITH LAW PARTNERS/ASSOCIATES/MEMBERS 2 OF FIRM ON CLIENT MATTER (IDENTIFY CLIENT BY NAME); 3 * PREPARED CERTIFIED FINANCIAL STATEMENT FOR CLIENT (IDENTIFY CLIENT BY 4 NAME); 5 * REFERRED INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY (IDENTIFY CLIENT BY NAME) FOR 6 REPRESENTATION OR CONSULTATION; 7 * COMMERCIAL BROKERING SERVICES (IDENTIFY CUSTOMER BY NAME); 8 * PREPARED CERTIFIED ARCHITECTURAL OR ENGINEERING 9 RENDERINGS FOR CLIENT (IDENTIFY CUSTOMER BY NAME); 10 * COURT APPOINTED GUARDIAN OR EVALUATOR (IDENTIFY COURT NOT CLIENT). 11 (ii) With respect to reporting individuals who disclosed in question 12 8(a) that the reporting individual did not provide services to a client 13 but provided services to a firm or business, identify the category of 14 amount received for providing such services and describe the services 15 rendered. 16 Services Actually Provided Category of Amount (Table I) ________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________________ 17 A reporting individual need not disclose activities performed while 18 lawfully acting in [his or her] the reporting individual's capacity as 19 provided in paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and (f) of subdivision seven of 20 section seventy-three of this article. 21 The disclosure requirement in questions (b-1) and (b-2) shall not 22 require disclosing clients or customers receiving medical, pharmaceu- 23 tical or dental services, mental health services, or residential real 24 estate brokering services from the reporting individual or [his or her] 25 the reporting individual's firm or if federal law prohibits or limits 26 disclosure. The reporting individual need not identify any client to 27 whom [he or she] the reporting individual or [his or her] the reporting 28 individual's firm provided legal representation with respect to investi- 29 gation or prosecution by law enforcement authorities, bankruptcy, family 30 court, estate planning, or domestic relations matters, nor shall the 31 reporting individual identify individuals represented pursuant to an 32 insurance policy but the reporting individual shall in such circum- 33 stances only report the entity that provides compensation to the report- 34 ing individual; with respect to matters in which the client's name is 35 required by law to be kept confidential (such as matters governed by the 36 family court act) or in matters in which the reporting individual 37 represents or provides services to minors, the client's name may be 38 replaced with initials. To the extent that the reporting individual, or 39 [his or her] the reporting individual's firm, provided legal represen- 40 tation with respect to an initial public offering, and professional 41 disciplinary rules, federal law or regulations restrict the disclosure 42 of information relating to such work, the reporting individual shall (i) 43 disclose the identity of the client and the services provided relating 44 to the initial public offering to the office of court administration, 45 who will maintain such information confidentially in a locked box; and 46 (ii) include in [his or her] the reporting individual's response to 47 questions (b-1) and (b-2) that pursuant to this paragraph, a disclosure 48 to the office of court administration has been made. Upon such time that 49 the disclosure of information maintained in the locked box is no longer 50 restricted by professional disciplinary rules, federal law or regu- 51 lation, the reporting individual shall disclose such information in an 52 amended disclosure statement in response to the disclosure requirements 53 in questions (b-1) and (b-2). The office of court administration shall S. 5234 9 1 develop and maintain a secure portal through which information submitted 2 to it pursuant to this paragraph can be safely and confidentially 3 stored. With respect to clients represented in other matters not other- 4 wise exempt, the reporting individual may request an exemption to 5 publicly disclosing the name of that client from the commission on 6 ethics and lobbying in government pursuant to section ninety-four of the 7 executive law, or from the office of court administration. In such 8 application, the reporting individual shall state the following: "My 9 client is not currently receiving my services or seeking my services in 10 connection with: 11 (i) A proposed bill or resolution in the senate or assembly during the 12 reporting period; 13 (ii) A contract in an amount totaling $10,000 or more from the state 14 or any state agency for services, materials, or property; 15 (iii) A grant of $10,000 or more from the state or any state agency 16 during the reporting period; 17 (iv) A grant obtained through a legislative initiative during the 18 reporting period; or 19 (v) A case, proceeding, application or other matter that is not a 20 ministerial matter before a state agency during the reporting period." 21 In reviewing the request for an exemption, the commission on ethics 22 and lobbying in government or the office of court administration may 23 consult with bar or other professional associations and the legislative 24 ethics commission for individuals subject to its jurisdiction and may 25 consider the rules of professional conduct. In making its determination, 26 the commission on ethics and lobbying in government or the office of 27 court administration shall conduct its own inquiry and shall consider 28 factors including, but not limited to: (i) the nature and the size of 29 the client; (ii) whether the client has any business before the state; 30 and if so, how significant the business is; and whether the client has 31 any particularized interest in pending legislation and if so how signif- 32 icant the interest is; (iii) whether disclosure may reveal trade 33 secrets; (iv) whether disclosure could reasonably result in retaliation 34 against the client; (v) whether disclosure may cause undue harm to the 35 client; (vi) whether disclosure may result in undue harm to the attor- 36 ney-client relationship; and (vii) whether disclosure may result in an 37 unnecessary invasion of privacy to the client. 38 The commission on ethics and lobbying in government or, as the case 39 may be, the office of court administration shall promptly make a final 40 determination in response to such request, which shall include an expla- 41 nation for its determination. The office of court administration shall 42 issue its final determination within three days of receiving the 43 request. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any professional 44 disciplinary rule to the contrary, the disclosure of the identity of any 45 client or customer in response to this question shall not constitute 46 professional misconduct or a ground for disciplinary action of any kind, 47 or form the basis for any civil or criminal cause of action or proceed- 48 ing. A reporting individual who first enters public office after January 49 first, two thousand sixteen, need not report clients or customers with 50 respect to matters for which the reporting individual or [his or her] 51 the reporting individual's firm was retained prior to entering public 52 office. 53 (c) APPLICABLE ONLY TO NEW CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS FOR WHOM SERVICES ARE 54 PROVIDED ON OR AFTER DECEMBER THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOUSAND FIFTEEN, OR FOR 55 NEW MATTERS FOR EXISTING CLIENTS OR CUSTOMERS WITH RESPECT TO THOSE S. 5234 10 1 SERVICES THAT ARE PROVIDED ON OR AFTER DECEMBER THIRTY-FIRST, TWO THOU- 2 SAND FIFTEEN: 3 If the reporting individual receives income of ten thousand dollars or 4 greater from any employment or activity reportable under question 8(a), 5 identify each registered lobbyist who has directly referred to such 6 individual a client who was successfully referred to the reporting indi- 7 vidual's business and from whom the reporting individual or firm 8 received a fee for services in excess of five thousand dollars. Report 9 only those referrals that were made to a reporting individual by direct 10 communication from a person known to such reporting individual to be a 11 registered lobbyist at the time the referral is made. With respect to 12 each such referral, the reporting individual shall identify the client, 13 the registered lobbyist who has made the referral, the category of value 14 of the compensation received and a general description of the type of 15 matter so referred. A reporting individual need not disclose activities 16 performed while lawfully acting pursuant to paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and 17 (f) of subdivision seven of section seventy-three of this article. The 18 disclosure requirements in this question shall not require disclosing 19 clients or customers receiving medical, pharmaceutical or dental 20 services, mental health services, or residential real estate brokering 21 services from the reporting individual or [his or her] the reporting 22 individual's firm or if federal law prohibits or limits disclosure. The 23 reporting individual need not identify any client to whom [he or she] 24 the reporting individual or [his or her] the reporting individual's firm 25 provided legal representation with respect to investigation or prose- 26 cution by law enforcement authorities, bankruptcy, family court, estate 27 planning, or domestic relations matters, nor shall the reporting indi- 28 vidual identify individuals represented pursuant to an insurance policy 29 but the reporting individual shall in such circumstances only report the 30 entity that provides compensation to the reporting individual; with 31 respect to matters in which the client's name is required by law to be 32 kept confidential (such as matters governed by the family court act) or 33 in matters in which the reporting individual represents or provides 34 services to minors, the client's name may be replaced with initials. To 35 the extent that the reporting individual, or [his or her] the reporting 36 individual's firm, provided legal representation with respect to an 37 initial public offering, and federal law or regulations restricts the 38 disclosure of information relating to such work, the reporting individ- 39 ual shall (i) disclose the identity of the client and the services 40 provided relating to the initial public offering to the office of court 41 administration, who will maintain such information confidentially in a 42 locked box; and (ii) include in [his or her] the reporting individual's 43 response a statement that pursuant to this paragraph, a disclosure to 44 the office of court administration has been made. Upon such time that 45 the disclosure of information maintained in the locked box is no longer 46 restricted by federal law or regulation, the reporting individual shall 47 disclose such information in an amended disclosure statement in response 48 to the disclosure requirements of this paragraph. The office of court 49 administration shall develop and maintain a secure portal through which 50 information submitted to it pursuant to this paragraph can be safely and 51 confidentially stored. With respect to clients represented in other 52 matters not otherwise exempt, the reporting individual may request an 53 exemption to publicly disclosing the name of that client from the 54 commission on ethics and lobbying in government pursuant to section 55 ninety-four of the executive law, or from the office of court adminis- 56 tration. In such application, the reporting individual shall state the S. 5234 11 1 following: "My client is not currently receiving my services or seeking 2 my services in connection with: 3 (i) A proposed bill or resolution in the senate or assembly during the 4 reporting period; 5 (ii) A contract in an amount totaling $10,000 or more from the state 6 or any state agency for services, materials, or property; 7 (iii) A grant of $10,000 or more from the state or any state agency 8 during the reporting period; 9 (iv) A grant obtained through a legislative initiative during the 10 reporting period; or 11 (v) A case, proceeding, application or other matter that is not a 12 ministerial matter before a state agency during the reporting period." 13 In reviewing the request for an exemption, the commission on ethics 14 and lobbying in government or the office of court administration may 15 consult with bar or other professional associations and the legislative 16 ethics commission for individuals subject to its jurisdiction and may 17 consider the rules of professional conduct. In making its determination, 18 the commission on ethics and lobbying in government or the office of 19 court administration shall conduct its own inquiry and shall consider 20 factors including, but not limited to: (i) the nature and the size of 21 the client; (ii) whether the client has any business before the state; 22 and if so, how significant the business is; and whether the client has 23 any particularized interest in pending legislation and if so how signif- 24 icant the interest is; (iii) whether disclosure may reveal trade 25 secrets; (iv) whether disclosure could reasonably result in retaliation 26 against the client; (v) whether disclosure may cause undue harm to the 27 client; (vi) whether disclosure may result in undue harm to the attor- 28 ney-client relationship; and (vii) whether disclosure may result in an 29 unnecessary invasion of privacy to the client. 30 The commission on ethics and lobbying in government or, as the case 31 may be, the office of court administration shall promptly make a final 32 determination in response to such request, which shall include an expla- 33 nation for its determination. The office of court administration shall 34 issue its final determination within three days of receiving the 35 request. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any professional 36 disciplinary rule to the contrary, the disclosure of the identity of any 37 client or customer in response to this question shall not constitute 38 professional misconduct or a ground for disciplinary action of any kind, 39 or form the basis for any civil or criminal cause of action or proceed- 40 ing. A reporting individual who first enters public office after Decem- 41 ber thirty-first, two thousand fifteen, need not report clients or 42 customers with respect to matters for which the reporting individual or 43 [his or her] the reporting individual's firm was retained prior to 44 entering public office. 45 Client Name of Lobbyist Description Category of Amount 46 of Matter (in Table 1) 47 ________________________________________________________________________ 48 ________________________________________________________________________ 49 ________________________________________________________________________ 50 ________________________________________________________________________ 51 ________________________________________________________________________ 52 (d) List the name, principal address and general description or the 53 nature of the business activity of any entity in which the reporting 54 individual or such individual's spouse or domestic partner had an S. 5234 12 1 investment in excess of $1,000 excluding investments in securities and 2 interests in real property. 3 9. List each source of gifts, EXCLUDING campaign contributions, in 4 EXCESS of $1,000, received during the reporting period for which this 5 statement is filed by the reporting individual or such individual's 6 spouse, domestic partner or unemancipated child from the same donor, 7 EXCLUDING gifts from a relative. INCLUDE the name and address of the 8 donor. The term "gifts" does not include reimbursements, which term is 9 defined in item 10. Indicate the value and nature of each such gift. 10 Category 11 Self, of 12 Spouse, Name of Nature Value of 13 Domestic Donor Address of Gift Gift 14 Partner (In Table I) 15 or Child 16 ____________________________________________________________________ 17 ____________________________________________________________________ 18 ____________________________________________________________________ 19 ____________________________________________________________________ 20 ____________________________________________________________________ 21 10. Identify and briefly describe the source of any reimbursements for 22 expenditures, EXCLUDING campaign expenditures and expenditures in 23 connection with official duties reimbursed by the state, in EXCESS 24 of $1,000 from each such source. For purposes of this item, the term 25 "reimbursements" shall mean any travel-related expenses provided by 26 nongovernmental sources and for activities related to the reporting 27 individual's official duties such as, speaking engagements, confer- 28 ences, or factfinding events. The term "reimbursements" does NOT 29 include gifts reported under item 9. 30 Source Description 31 ____________________________________________________________________ 32 ____________________________________________________________________ 33 ____________________________________________________________________ 34 ____________________________________________________________________ 35 ____________________________________________________________________ 36 11. List the identity and value, if reasonably ascertainable, of each 37 interest in a trust, estate or other beneficial interest, including 38 retirement plans (other than retirement plans of the state of New 39 York or the city of New York), and deferred compensation plans 40 (e.g., 401, 403(b), 457, etc.) established in accordance with the 41 internal revenue code, in which the REPORTING INDIVIDUAL held a 42 beneficial interest in EXCESS of $1,000 at any time during the 43 preceding year. Do NOT report interests in a trust, estate or other 44 beneficial interest established by or for, or the estate of, a rela- 45 tive. 46 Category 47 Identity of Value* 48 (In Table II) S. 5234 13 1 ____________________________________________________________________ 2 ____________________________________________________________________ 3 ____________________________________________________________________ 4 ____________________________________________________________________ 5 ____________________________________________________________________ 6 * The value of such interest shall be reported only if reasonably 7 ascertainable. 8 12. (a) Describe the terms of, and the parties to, any contract, prom- 9 ise, or other agreement between the reporting individual and any 10 person, firm, or corporation with respect to the employment of such 11 individual after leaving office or position (other than a leave of 12 absence). 13 ____________________________________________________________________ 14 ____________________________________________________________________ 15 ____________________________________________________________________ 16 ____________________________________________________________________ 17 ____________________________________________________________________ 18 (b) Describe the parties to and the terms of any agreement providing 19 for continuation of payments or benefits to the REPORTING INDIVIDUAL 20 in EXCESS of $1,000 from a prior employer OTHER THAN the State. 21 (This includes interests in or contributions to a pension fund, 22 profit-sharing plan, or life or health insurance; buy-out agree- 23 ments; severance payments; etc.) 24 ____________________________________________________________________ 25 ____________________________________________________________________ 26 ____________________________________________________________________ 27 ____________________________________________________________________ 28 ____________________________________________________________________ 29 13. List below the nature and amount of any income in EXCESS of $1,000 30 from EACH SOURCE for the reporting individual and such individual's 31 spouse or domestic partner for the taxable year last occurring prior 32 to the date of filing. Each such source must be described with 33 particularity. Nature of income includes, but is not limited to, all 34 income (other than that received from the employment listed under 35 Item 2 above) from compensated employment whether public or private, 36 directorships and other fiduciary positions, contractual arrange- 37 ments, teaching income, partnerships, honorariums, lecture fees, 38 consultant fees, bank and bond interest, dividends, income derived 39 from a trust, real estate rents, and recognized gains from the sale 40 or exchange of real or other property. Income from a business or 41 profession and real estate rents shall be reported with the source 42 identified by the building address in the case of real estate rents 43 and otherwise by the name of the entity and not by the name of the 44 individual customers, clients or tenants, with the aggregate net 45 income before taxes for each building address or entity. The 46 receipt of maintenance received in connection with a matrimonial 47 action, alimony and child support payments shall not be listed. 48 Self/ Category 49 Spouse Source Nature of Amount S. 5234 14 1 or Domestic (In Table I) 2 Partner 3 ____________________________________________________________________ 4 ____________________________________________________________________ 5 ____________________________________________________________________ 6 ____________________________________________________________________ 7 ____________________________________________________________________ 8 14. List the sources of any deferred income (not retirement income) in 9 EXCESS of $1,000 from each source to be paid to the reporting indi- 10 vidual following the close of the calendar year for which this 11 disclosure statement is filed, other than deferred compensation 12 reported in item 11 hereinabove. Deferred income derived from the 13 practice of a profession shall be listed in the aggregate and shall 14 identify as the source, the name of the firm, corporation, partner- 15 ship or association through which the income was derived, but shall 16 not identify individual clients. 17 Category 18 Source of Amount 19 (In Table I) 20 ____________________________________________________________________ 21 ____________________________________________________________________ 22 ____________________________________________________________________ 23 ____________________________________________________________________ 24 ____________________________________________________________________ 25 15. List each assignment of income in EXCESS of $1,000, and each trans- 26 fer other than to a relative during the reporting period for which 27 this statement is filed for less than fair consideration of an 28 interest in a trust, estate or other beneficial interest, securities 29 or real property, by the reporting individual, in excess of $1,000, 30 which would otherwise be required to be reported herein and is not 31 or has not been so reported. 32 Item Assigned Assigned or Category 33 or Transferred Transferred to of Value 34 (In Table I) 35 ____________________________________________________________________ 36 ____________________________________________________________________ 37 ____________________________________________________________________ 38 ____________________________________________________________________ 39 ____________________________________________________________________ 40 16. List below the type and market value of securities held by the 41 reporting individual or such individual's spouse or domestic partner 42 from each issuing entity in EXCESS of $1,000 at the close of the 43 taxable year last occurring prior to the date of filing, including 44 the name of the issuing entity exclusive of securities held by the 45 reporting individual issued by a professional corporation. Whenever 46 an interest in securities exists through a beneficial interest in a 47 trust, the securities held in such trust shall be listed ONLY IF the 48 reporting individual has knowledge thereof except where the report- S. 5234 15 1 ing individual or the reporting individual's spouse or domestic 2 partner has transferred assets to such trust for [his or her] the 3 reporting individual's benefit in which event such securities shall 4 be listed unless they are not ascertainable by the reporting indi- 5 vidual because the trustee is under an obligation or has been 6 instructed in writing not to disclose the contents of the trust to 7 the reporting individual. Securities of which the reporting individ- 8 ual or the reporting individual's spouse or domestic partner is the 9 owner of record but in which such individual or the reporting indi- 10 vidual's spouse or domestic partner has no beneficial interest shall 11 not be listed. Indicate percentage of ownership ONLY if the report- 12 ing person or the reporting person's spouse or domestic partner 13 holds more than five percent (5%) of the stock of a corporation in 14 which the stock is publicly traded or more than ten percent (10%) of 15 the stock of a corporation in which the stock is NOT publicly trad- 16 ed. Also list securities owned for investment purposes by a corpo- 17 ration more than fifty percent (50%) of the stock of which is owned 18 or controlled by the reporting individual or such individual's 19 spouse or domestic partner. For the purpose of this item the term 20 "securities" shall mean mutual funds, bonds, mortgages, notes, obli- 21 gations, warrants and stocks of any class, investment interests in 22 limited or general partnerships and certificates of deposits (CDs) 23 and such other evidences of indebtedness and certificates of inter- 24 est as are usually referred to as securities. The market value for 25 such securities shall be reported only if reasonably ascertainable 26 and shall not be reported if the security is an interest in a gener- 27 al partnership that was listed in item 8 (a) or if the security is 28 corporate stock, NOT publicly traded, in a trade or business of a 29 reporting individual or a reporting individual's spouse or domestic 30 partner. 31 Percentage 32 of corporate 33 stock owned 34 or controlled Category of 35 (if more than Market Value 36 5% of pub- as of the close 37 licly traded of the 38 stock, or taxable year 39 more than last occurring 40 10% if stock prior to 41 Self/ Issuing Type of not publicly the filing of 42 Spouse Entity Security traded, is held) this statement 43 or (In Table II) 44 Domestic 45 Partner 46 ____________________________________________________________________ 47 ____________________________________________________________________ 48 ____________________________________________________________________ 49 ____________________________________________________________________ 50 ____________________________________________________________________ 51 16-a. List below the name and market value of digital assets held by the 52 reporting individual or such individual's spouse or domestic partner 53 in EXCESS of $1,000 at the close of the taxable year last occurring S. 5234 16 1 prior to the date of filing. Whenever an interest in digital assets 2 exists through a beneficial interest in a trust, the digital assets 3 held in such trust shall be listed ONLY IF the reporting individual 4 has knowledge thereof except where the reporting individual or the 5 reporting individual's spouse or domestic partner has transferred 6 assets to such trust for [his or her] the reporting individual's 7 benefit in which event such digital assets shall be listed unless 8 they are not ascertainable by the reporting individual because the 9 trustee is under an obligation or has been instructed in writing not 10 to disclose the contents of the trust to the reporting individual. 11 The digital assets of which the reporting individual or the report- 12 ing individual's spouse or domestic partner is the owner of record 13 but in which such individual or the reporting individual's spouse or 14 domestic partner has no beneficial interest shall not be listed. 15 Also list digital assets owned for investment purposes by a corpo- 16 ration more than fifty percent (50%) of the stock of which is owned 17 or controlled by the reporting individual or such individual's 18 spouse or domestic partner. For purposes of this subdivision, the 19 following terms shall have the following meanings: 20 (a) "Digital asset" shall mean an asset that is issued, transferred, 21 or both, using distributed ledger or blockchain technology, including, 22 but not limited to, digital currencies, digital coins, digital non-fun- 23 gible tokens or other similar assets. 24 (b) "Digital currency" shall mean any type of digital unit that is 25 used as a medium of exchange or a form of digitally stored value. Virtu- 26 al currency shall be broadly construed to include digital units of 27 exchange that: (i) have a centralized repository or administrator; (ii) 28 are decentralized and have no centralized repository or administrator; 29 or (iii) may be created or obtained by computing, manufacturing, or 30 other similar effort. 31 (c) "Distributed ledger or blockchain technology" shall mean a ledger 32 or database that stores shared state by maintaining it across a multi- 33 plicity of devices belonging to different entities and securing it 34 through a combination of cryptographic and consensus protocols, where 35 the shared state serves to authenticate, record, share, and/or synchro- 36 nize transactions involving digital assets or virtual currencies. 37 Category of 38 Market Value 39 as of the close 40 of the taxable 41 year last 42 occurring 43 prior to 44 Self/ Type of the filing of 45 Spouse or Digital Asset this statement 46 Domestic (In Table II) 47 Partner 48 _______________________________________________________________________ 49 _______________________________________________________________________ 50 _______________________________________________________________________ 51 _______________________________________________________________________ 52 _______________________________________________________________________ 53 17. List below the location, size, general nature, acquisition date, 54 market value and percentage of ownership of any real property in 55 which any vested or contingent interest in EXCESS of $1,000 is held S. 5234 17 1 by the reporting individual or the reporting individual's spouse or 2 domestic partner. Also list real property owned for investment 3 purposes by a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) of the stock 4 of which is owned or controlled by the reporting individual or such 5 individual's spouse or domestic partner. Do NOT list any real prop- 6 erty which is the primary or secondary personal residence of the 7 reporting individual or the reporting individual's spouse or domes- 8 tic partner, except where there is a co-owner who is other than a 9 relative. 10 Self/ Percentage Category 11 Spouse/ General Acquisition of of Market 12 Domestic Nature Date Ownership Value 13 Partner (In 14 Corporation Location Size Table II) 15 ________________________________________________________________________ 16 ________________________________________________________________________ 17 ________________________________________________________________________ 18 ________________________________________________________________________ 19 ________________________________________________________________________ 20 18. List below all notes and accounts receivable, other than from goods 21 or services sold, held by the reporting individual at the close of 22 the taxable year last occurring prior to the date of filing and 23 other debts owed to such individual at the close of the taxable year 24 last occurring prior to the date of filing, in EXCESS of $1,000, 25 including the name of the debtor, type of obligation, date due and 26 the nature of the collateral securing payment of each, if any, 27 excluding securities reported in item 16 hereinabove. Debts, notes 28 and accounts receivable owed to the individual by a relative shall 29 not be reported. 30 Type of Obligation, Category 31 Date Due, and Nature of 32 Name of Debtor of Collateral, if any Amount 33 (In Table II) 34 ____________________________________________________________________ 35 ____________________________________________________________________ 36 ____________________________________________________________________ 37 ____________________________________________________________________ 38 ____________________________________________________________________ 39 19. List below all liabilities of the reporting individual and such 40 individual's spouse or domestic partner, in EXCESS of $10,000 as of 41 the date of filing of this statement, other than liabilities to a 42 relative. Do NOT list liabilities incurred by, or guarantees made 43 by, the reporting individual or such individual's spouse or domestic 44 partner or by any proprietorship, partnership or corporation in 45 which the reporting individual or such individual's spouse or domes- 46 tic partner has an interest, when incurred or made in the ordinary 47 course of the trade, business or professional practice of the 48 reporting individual or such individual's spouse or domestic part- 49 ner. Include the name of the creditor and any collateral pledged by 50 such individual to secure payment of any such liability. A reporting S. 5234 18 1 individual shall not list any obligation to pay maintenance in 2 connection with a matrimonial action, alimony or child support 3 payments. Any loan issued in the ordinary course of business by a 4 financial institution to finance educational costs, the cost of home 5 purchase or improvements for a primary or secondary residence, or 6 purchase of a personally owned motor vehicle, household furniture or 7 appliances shall be excluded. If any such reportable liability has 8 been guaranteed by any third person, list the liability and name the 9 guarantor. 10 Category 11 Name of Creditor Type of Liability of 12 or Guarantor and Collateral, if any Amount 13 (In Table II) 14 ____________________________________________________________________ 15 ____________________________________________________________________ 16 ____________________________________________________________________ 17 ____________________________________________________________________ 18 ____________________________________________________________________ 19 The requirements of law relating to the reporting of financial 20 interests are in the public interest and no adverse inference of 21 unethical or illegal conduct or behavior will be drawn merely from 22 compliance with these requirements. 23 ___________________________________ _________________________ 24 (Signature of Reporting Individual) Date (month/day/year) 25 TABLE I 26 Category A none 27 Category B $ 1 to under $ 1,000 28 Category C $ 1,000 to under $ 5,000 29 Category D $ 5,000 to under $ 20,000 30 Category E $ 20,000 to under $ 50,000 31 Category F $ 50,000 to under $ 75,000 32 Category G $ 75,000 to under $ 100,000 33 Category H $ 100,000 to under $ 150,000 34 Category I $ 150,000 to under $ 250,000 35 Category J $ 250,000 to under $ 350,000 36 Category K $ 350,000 to under $ 450,000 37 Category L $ 450,000 to under $ 550,000 38 Category M $ 550,000 to under $ 650,000 39 Category N $ 650,000 to under $ 750,000 40 Category O $ 750,000 to under $ 850,000 41 Category P $ 850,000 to under $ 950,000 42 Category Q $ 950,000 to under $1,050,000 43 Category R $1,050,000 to under $1,150,000 44 Category S $1,150,000 to under $1,250,000 45 Category T $1,250,000 to under $1,350,000 46 Category U $1,350,000 to under $1,450,000 47 Category V $1,450,000 to under $1,550,000 48 Category W $1,550,000 to under $1,650,000 49 Category X $1,650,000 to under $1,750,000 50 Category Y $1,750,000 to under $1,850,000 51 Category Z $1,850,000 to under $1,950,000 S. 5234 19 1 Category AA $1,950,000 to under $2,050,000 2 Category BB $2,050,000 to under $2,150,000 3 Category CC $2,150,000 to under $2,250,000 4 Category DD $2,250,000 to under $2,350,000 5 Category EE $2,350,000 to under $2,450,000 6 Category FF $2,450,000 to under $2,550,000 7 Category GG $2,550,000 to under $2,650,000 8 Category HH $2,650,000 to under $2,750,000 9 Category II $2,750,000 to under $2,850,000 10 Category JJ $2,850,000 to under $2,950,000 11 Category KK $2,950,000 to under $3,050,000 12 Category LL $3,050,000 to under $3,150,000 13 Category MM $3,150,000 to under $3,250,000 14 Category NN $3,250,000 to under $3,350,000 15 Category OO $3,350,000 to under $3,450,000 16 Category PP $3,450,000 to under $3,550,000 17 Category QQ $3,550,000 to under $3,650,000 18 Category RR $3,650,000 to under $3,750,000 19 Category SS $3,750,000 to under $3,850,000 20 Category TT $3,850,000 to under $3,950,000 21 Category UU $3,950,000 to under $4,050,000 22 Category VV $4,050,000 to under $4,150,000 23 Category WW $4,150,000 to under $4,250,000 24 Category XX $4,250,000 to under $4,350,000 25 Category YY $4,350,000 to under $4,450,000 26 Category ZZ $4,450,000 to under $4,550,000 27 Category AAA $4,550,000 to under $4,650,000 28 Category BBB $4,650,000 to under $4,750,000 29 Category CCC $4,750,000 to under $4,850,000 30 Category DDD $4,850,000 to under $4,950,000 31 Category EEE $4,950,000 to under $5,050,000 32 Category FFF $5,050,000 to under $5,150,000 33 Category GGG $5,150,000 to under $5,250,000 34 Category HHH $5,250,000 to under $5,350,000 35 Category III $5,350,000 to under $5,450,000 36 Category JJJ $5,450,000 to under $5,550,000 37 Category KKK $5,550,000 to under $5,650,000 38 Category LLL $5,650,000 to under $5,750,000 39 Category MMM $5,750,000 to under $5,850,000 40 Category NNN $5,850,000 to under $5,950,000 41 Category OOO $5,950,000 to under $6,050,000 42 Category PPP $6,050,000 to under $6,150,000 43 Category QQQ $6,150,000 to under $6,250,000 44 Category RRR $6,250,000 to under $6,350,000 45 Category SSS $6,350,000 to under $6,450,000 46 Category TTT $6,450,000 to under $6,550,000 47 Category UUU $6,550,000 to under $6,650,000 48 Category VVV $6,650,000 to under $6,750,000 49 Category WWW $6,750,000 to under $6,850,000 50 Category XXX $6,850,000 to under $6,950,000 51 Category YYY $6,950,000 to under $7,050,000 52 Category ZZZ $7,050,000 to under $7,150,000 53 Category AAAA $7,150,000 to under $7,250,000 54 Category BBBB $7,250,000 to under $7,350,000 55 Category CCCC $7,350,000 to under $7,450,000 56 Category DDDD $7,450,000 to under $7,550,000 S. 5234 20 1 Category EEEE $7,550,000 to under $7,650,000 2 Category FFFF $7,650,000 to under $7,750,000 3 Category GGGG $7,750,000 to under $7,850,000 4 Category HHHH $7,850,000 to under $7,950,000 5 Category IIII $7,950,000 to under $8,050,000 6 Category JJJJ $8,050,000 to under $8,150,000 7 Category KKKK $8,150,000 to under $8,250,000 8 Category LLLL $8,250,000 to under $8,350,000 9 Category MMMM $8,350,000 to under $8,450,000 10 Category NNNN $8,450,000 to under $8,550,000 11 Category OOOO $8,550,000 to under $8,650,000 12 Category PPPP $8,650,000 to under $8,750,000 13 Category QQQQ $8,750,000 to under $8,850,000 14 Category RRRR $8,850,000 to under $8,950,000 15 Category SSSS $8,950,000 to under $9,050,000 16 Category TTTT $9,050,000 to under $9,150,000 17 Category UUUU $9,150,000 to under $9,250,000 18 Category VVVV $9,250,000 to under $9,350,000 19 Category WWWW $9,350,000 to under $9,450,000 20 Category XXXX $9,450,000 to under $9,550,000 21 Category YYYY $9,550,000 to under $9,650,000 22 Category ZZZZ $9,650,000 to under $9,750,000 23 Category AAAAA $9,750,000 to under $9,850,000 24 Category BBBBB $9,850,000 to under $9,950,000 25 Category CCCCC $9,950,000 to under $10,000,000 26 Category DDDDD $10,000,000 or over 27 TABLE II 28 Category A none 29 Category B $ 1 to under $ 1,000 30 Category C $ 1,000 to under $ 5,000 31 Category D $ 5,000 to under $ 20,000 32 Category E $ 20,000 to under $ 50,000 33 Category F $ 50,000 to under $ 75,000 34 Category G $ 75,000 to under $ 100,000 35 Category H $ 100,000 to under $ 150,000 36 Category I $ 150,000 to under $ 250,000 37 Category J $ 250,000 to under $ 500,000 38 Category K $ 500,000 to under $ 750,000 39 Category L $ 750,000 to under $1,000,000 40 Category M $1,000,000 to under $1,250,000 41 Category N $1,250,000 to under $1,500,000 42 Category O $1,500,000 to under $1,750,000 43 Category P $1,750,000 to under $2,000,000 44 Category Q $2,000,000 to under $2,250,000 45 Category R $2,250,000 to under $2,500,000 46 Category S $2,500,000 to under $2,750,000 47 Category T $2,750,000 to under $3,000,000 48 Category U $3,000,000 to under $3,250,000 49 Category V $3,250,000 to under $3,500,000 50 Category W $3,500,000 to under $3,750,000 51 Category X $3,750,000 to under $4,000,000 52 Category Y $4,000,000 to under $4,250,000 53 Category Z $4,250,000 to under $4,500,000 54 Category AA $4,500,000 to under $4,750,000 55 Category BB $4,750,000 to under $5,000,000 S. 5234 21 1 Category CC $5,000,000 to under $5,250,000 2 Category DD $5,250,000 to under $5,500,000 3 Category EE $5,500,000 to under $5,750,000 4 Category FF $5,750,000 to under $6,000,000 5 Category GG $6,000,000 to under $6,250,000 6 Category HH $6,250,000 to under $6,500,000 7 Category II $6,500,000 to under $6,750,000 8 Category JJ $6,750,000 to under $7,000,000 9 Category KK $7,000,000 to under $7,250,000 10 Category LL $7,250,000 to under $7,500,000 11 Category MM $7,500,000 to under $7,750,000 12 Category NN $7,750,000 to under $8,000,000 13 Category OO $8,000,000 to under $8,250,000 14 Category PP $8,250,000 to under $8,500,000 15 Category QQ $8,500,000 to under $8,750,000 16 Category RR $8,750,000 to under $9,000,000 17 Category SS $9,000,000 to under $9,250,000 18 Category TT $9,250,000 to under $9,500,000 19 Category UU $9,500,000 or over 20 (b) The commission on ethics and lobbying in government shall make 21 available an editable, electronic, readable and searchable version of 22 the annual statement of financial disclosure by January first, two thou- 23 sand twenty-six to all those required by law to submit such forms. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however that 25 section one of this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.